Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska53-120
Ready-to-drink cocktails; production and sale; rules and regulations.

The commission may adopt and promulgate rules and regulations pertaining to the production and sale of ready-to-drink cocktails.

Laws 2021, LB274, § 7.
May 26, 2021